Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5111.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-22 of the General Laws entitled "Curriculum [See Title 16
Chapter 97 - The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
following sections:
16-22-39. Recommendations on the development of computer science curriculum.
(a) The council on elementary and secondary education ("council") shall develop
recommendations on a computer science curriculum to prepare students for successful
postsecondary education and careers in computer science, information technology, and related
fields. In developing these recommendations, the council shall consider policies and practices that
are designed to increase access to high-quality educational experiences that help more students
obtain careers in these fields.
(b) The council's recommendations shall identify:
(1) High school courses in computer science, including computer coding and computer
programming, of sufficient rigor that may be used to satisfy admissions requirements at state
colleges and universities, including requirements for mathematics and science;
(2) Common academic and technical skills needed for students to meet projected labor
market demands in computer science, information technology, and related fields in and outside of
the state;
(3) How middle and high school students, including underrepresented and nontraditional
students, can be encouraged to pursue further studies and careers in computer science, information

technology, and related fields;
(4) Secondary course sequences which prepare students to succeed in postsecondary
educational programs in computer science, information technology, and related fields;
(5) Gaps in current policy, curricula, programs, and practices at the state, school district,
and postsecondary level which inhibit students from pursuing advanced studies and careers in
computer science, information technology, and related fields;
(6) Appropriate educator qualifications and computer science pedagogy to maintain
technologically current instructional knowledge and practices in teacher preparation programs; and
(7) Common definitions for terms related to computer science, including terms such as
"computer coding" and "computer programming," for consistent use across both the Rhode Island
kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) education system and the state's postsecondary education
system.
(c) By December 31, 2026, the council shall report its recommendations to the board of
education, the governor, and the general assembly.
16-22-40. Computer science and technology instruction.
(a) By June 30, 2027, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education
("commissioner") shall develop academic standards for a computer science high school curriculum,
including standards and benchmarks for computer coding and computer programming, and identify
high school-level courses which incorporate those standards and prepare students for postsecondary
success in computer science, information technology, and related fields. In developing these
standards, the commissioner shall consider and incorporate the recommendations made by the
council on elementary and secondary education pursuant to §16-22-30, to the fullest extent the
commissioner deems practicable.
(b) The courses in the computer science curriculum should, to the extent academically
feasible, enable a student to utilize computer science courses to meet mathematics, and science
admission requirements at the state colleges and universities, including the Community College of
Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the University of Rhode Island.
(c) If a school district does not offer a course identified by the commissioner pursuant to
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, that district shall provide students access to the course
through a virtual school or education program, an online program, or through other means.
(d) If a student is enrolled in an identified course that satisfies a mathematics, or science
admissions requirement for a state postsecondary school, including the Community College of
Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the University of Rhode Island, the school district shall
notify the student that they should contact any private in-state or out-of-state public or private
LC000098 - Page 2 of 4

postsecondary institution to which that student is applying and inquire whether the course credit
satisfies any of the institution's admissions requirements.
(e) The commissioner shall annually report to the council on elementary and secondary
education, the governor, and the general assembly on:
(1) The courses identified by the commissioner that meet the academic standards for
computer science;
(2) The number of students, by district, including all public schools and charter public
schools, who are enrolled in courses identified by the commissioner that meet the academic
standards for computer science; and
(3) The number of teachers, educators and other individuals who hold a valid educator
certificate in computer science or a related field.
(f) The council on elementary and secondary education shall consult with the board of
education and school districts to develop strategies for recruiting qualified teachers to provide
computer science instruction, updating computer science educator certification requirements,
providing appropriate professional development to maintain technologically current instructional
knowledge and practices in the school districts, and identifying and streamlining traditional and
alternative pathways toward computer science educator certification.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000098
========
LC000098 - Page 3 of 4